Missouri, session 2026, HB2060.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 137.016, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 137.016, to read as follows:
137.016. 1. As used in Section 4(b) of Article X of the Missouri Constitution, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Residential property", all real property improved by a structure which is used or
intended to be used for residential living by human occupants, vacant land in connection with
an airport, land used as a golf course, manufactured home parks, bed and breakfast inns in
which the owner resides and uses as a primary residence with six or fewer rooms for rent, and
time-share units as defined in section 407.600, except to the extent such units are actually
rented and subject to sales tax under subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of section 144.020, but
residential property shall not include other similar facilities used primarily for transient
housing. A single family home leased for a term of less than thirty consecutive days, in
whole or in part, subject to sales tax under subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of section
144.020 shall be classified only as residential property. For the purposes of this section,
"transient housing" means all rooms available for rent or lease for which the receipts from the
rent or lease of such rooms are subject to state sales tax pursuant to subdivision (6) of
subsection 1 of section 144.020; the leasing of a single family home, in whole or in part,
for a term of less than thirty consecutive days does not in itself constitute "transient
housing";
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2060 2
(2) "Agricultural and horticultural property", all real property used for agricultural
purposes and devoted primarily to the raising and harvesting of crops; to the feeding,
breeding and management of livestock which shall include breeding, showing, and boarding
of horses; to dairying, or to any other combination thereof; and buildings and structures
customarily associated with farming, agricultural, and horticultural uses. Agricultural and
horticultural property shall also include land devoted to and qualifying for payments or other
compensation under a soil conservation or agricultural assistance program under an
agreement with an agency of the federal government. Agricultural and horticultural property
shall further include any reliever airport. Real property classified as forest croplands shall not
be agricultural or horticultural property so long as it is classified as forest croplands and shall
be taxed in accordance with the laws enacted to implement Section 7 of Article X of the
Missouri Constitution. Agricultural and horticultural property shall also include any sawmill
or planing mill defined in the U.S. Department of Labor's Standard Industrial Classification
(SIC) Manual under Industry Group 242 with the SIC number 2421. Agricultural and
horticultural property shall also include urban and community gardens. For the purposes of
this section, "urban and community gardens" shall include real property cultivated by
residents of a neighborhood or community for the purposes of providing agricultural
products, as defined in section 262.900, for the use of residents of the neighborhood or
community, and shall not include a garden intended for individual or personal use;
(3) "Utility, industrial, commercial, railroad and other real property", all real property
used directly or indirectly for any commercial, mining, industrial, manufacturing, trade,
professional, business, or similar purpose, including all property centrally assessed by the
state tax commission but shall not include floating docks, portions of which are separately
owned and the remainder of which is designated for common ownership and in which no one
person or business entity owns more than five individual units. All other real property not
included in the property listed in subclasses (1) and (2) of Section 4(b) of Article X of the
Missouri Constitution, as such property is defined in this section, shall be deemed to be
included in the term "utility, industrial, commercial, railroad and other real property".
2. Pursuant to Article X of the state Constitution, any taxing district may adjust its
operating levy to recoup any loss of property tax revenue, except revenues from the surtax
imposed pursuant to Article X, Subsection 2 of Section 6 of the Constitution, as the result of
changing the classification of structures intended to be used for residential living by human
occupants which contain five or more dwelling units if such adjustment of the levy does not
exceed the highest tax rate in effect subsequent to the 1980 tax year. For purposes of this
section, loss in revenue shall include the difference between the revenue that would have been
collected on such property under its classification prior to enactment of this section and the
amount to be collected under its classification under this section. The county assessor of each

HB 2060 3
county or city not within a county shall provide information to each taxing district within its
boundaries regarding the difference in assessed valuation of such property as the result of
such change in classification.
3. All reclassification of property as the result of changing the classification of
structures intended to be used for residential living by human occupants which contain five or
more dwelling units shall apply to assessments made after December 31, 1994.
4. Where real property is used or held for use for more than one purpose and such
uses result in different classifications, the county assessor shall allocate to each classification
the percentage of the true value in money of the property devoted to each use; except that,
where agricultural and horticultural property, as defined in this section, also contains a
dwelling unit or units, the farm dwelling, appurtenant residential-related structures and up to
five acres immediately surrounding such farm dwelling shall be residential property, as
defined in this section, provided that the portion of property used or held for use as an urban
and community garden shall not be residential property. This subsection shall not apply to
any reliever airport.
5. All real property which is vacant, unused, or held for future use; which is used for a
private club, a not-for-profit or other nonexempt lodge, club, business, trade, service
organization, or similar entity; or for which a determination as to its classification cannot be
made under the definitions set out in subsection 1 of this section, shall be classified according
to its immediate most suitable economic use, which use shall be determined after
consideration of:
(1) Immediate prior use, if any, of such property;
(2) Location of such property;
(3) Zoning classification of such property; except that, such zoning classification
shall not be considered conclusive if, upon consideration of all factors, it is determined that
such zoning classification does not reflect the immediate most suitable economic use of the
property;
(4) Other legal restrictions on the use of such property;
(5) Availability of water, electricity, gas, sewers, street lighting, and other public
services for such property;
(6) Size of such property;
(7) Access of such property to public thoroughfares; and
(8) Any other factors relevant to a determination of the immediate most suitable
economic use of such property.
6. All lands classified as forest croplands shall not, for taxation purposes, be
classified as subclass (1), subclass (2), or subclass (3) real property, as such classes are
prescribed in Section 4(b) of Article X of the Missouri Constitution and defined in this

HB 2060 4
section, but shall be taxed in accordance with the laws enacted to implement Section 7 of
Article X of the Missouri Constitution.
✔